District of Columbia statutes.
22-4509

Dealers of weapons to be licensed.

No retail dealer shall within the District of Columbia sell or expose for sale or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, any pistol, machine gun, sawed-off shotgun, or blackjack without being licensed as provided in § 22-4510. No wholesale dealer shall, within the District of Columbia, sell, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, to any person other than a licensed dealer, any pistol, machine gun, sawed-off shotgun, or blackjack.

History

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 652, ch. 465, § 9
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 15(h), 41 DCR 1639

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-4510.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3209.
1973 Ed., § 22-3209.